District of Columbia statutes.
38-2912

Variations in per pupil allocations.

Variations from uniformity in the Formula are not intended as an exercise of the Council’s line-item authority over the DCPS budget. Allocations by the count of students in certain grade levels and programs are intended only to generate total appropriation amounts on a per student basis.

Mar. 26, 1999, D.C. Law 12-207, § 113, 45 DCR 8095
For temporary (90 day) addition of § 38-2951, see § 3372 of Fiscal Year 2003 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-453, July 23, 2002, 49 DCR 8026).
For temporary (90-day) addition of section, see § 2 of the School Proximity Traffic Calming Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-279, March 7, 2000, 47 DCR 2209).
For temporary (90-day) addition of section, see § 2 of the School Proximity Traffic Calming Emergency Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-195, December 1, 1999, 46 DCR 10437).
For temporary addition of chapter, see note to § 38-2901.
See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 38-2901.
Section 4(b) of D.C. Laws 13-087 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
“(i) For purposes of this act, ‘traffic control devices’ includes traffic signals, flashing red and yellow signals, stop signs, signs that warn of the existence of children, markers, speed humps or bumps, rumble strips, or signs that reduce the speed limit.”
“(h) The Mayor shall submit a report to the Council which shall include the findings of the investigation and the type of traffic control devices that should be installed at all school zones within 60 days from the effective date of this act.
“(g) Traffic control devices, when constructed and posted pursuant to this section, shall not be deemed obstructions of the road or street. No action shall be brought on behalf of any party against the District for damages caused by a speed control device.
“(f) At least one crossing guard shall be placed at elementary schools. Crossing guards shall be placed at middle or junior high schools, and high schools where deemed necessary by the Metropolitan Police Department.
“(e) School zones shall have a speed limit posted at 15 miles per hour and signs erected warning of the existence of children. For those school zones that have a traffic control device, signs shall be erected warning of the existence of these devices.
“(d) The information in subsection (c) of this section shall be made available, within 15 days from the date of request from the Mayor.
“(2) The type of injuries suffered.
“(1) The number of persons who were hit by a vehicle, bicycle or motorcycle in and around school zones; and
“(c) The District of Columbia Public Schools and the Metropolitan Police Department shall submit monthly statistical reports to the Mayor which shall include:
“(b) The Mayor shall, when conducting an investigation, consider the number of persons who have been hit by a vehicle, bicycle, or motorcycle in a school zone, the likelihood of these accidents occurring in the future and the volume of traffic.
“(a) The Mayor is authorized to install traffic control devices, as deemed necessary, after completing an investigation of school zones.
Section 2 of D.C. Laws 13-087 added the School Proximity Traffic Calming Temporary Act of 1999 to read as follows:
1981 Ed., § 31-2912.